
F09983

1

2B−R

IgnitionSwitch

AM1 IG1

4 L−B A

J15
J/C

A L−B

Cowl Side LH
14
2D 2J

6ECU−IG
B−W

6
A53 IG1

IG1

ABS & BA & TRC
& VSC ECU

B−R

Engine Room J/B
15
1E 1O

1AM1No.2 AM1No.1

FL Block
ALT 2 B

Battery EA

W−B

Engine Room J/B
9 19

1J 1E W−B
A

J54 J/C

A

A

W−B

W−B

W−B
W−B

W−B
W−B

W−B

8

A52

17

31

6

EB

GND1

GND2

GND4

GND3

LHD:

A53

A53

A52

DI−110 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DTC C 1257 / 57 Power Supply Drive Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1257 /57 Whenmalfunction insideECUisdetected.
SBattery
SPowersourcecircuit
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI6XU−01
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbatteryvoltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK
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2 Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester.
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thevoltageconditionoutput fromtheECUdisplayedon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals IG1 and GND of ABS

& BA & TRC & VSC ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

NG

3 Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connec-
tor and body ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistancebetween terminalGNDofABS&BA&TRC
& VSC ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 � or less

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4CheckECU −IGfuse.

PREPARATION:
RemoveECU −IGfuse fromthecowlsideJ/BLH.
CHECK:
CheckcontinuityofECU −IGfuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
componentsconnectedtoECU −IGfuse(Seeat-
tached wiring diagram).

OK

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and bat-
tery (See page IN−35).


